Colorado, session 2026A, HB1093.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add 23-5-151 as
follows:
23-5-151. Implementing the college opportunity fund for
persons incarcerated in Colorado working group - creation -
members - duties - report - repeal.
(1) THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR OF THE DEPARTMENT OF HIGHER
EDUCATION, OR THEIR DESIGNEE, SHALL CONVENE A WORKING GROUP TO
STUDY HOW TO IMPLEMENT THE COLLEGE OPPORTUNITY FUND, CREATED
IN SECTION 23-18-202, FOR PERSONS INCARCERATED IN COLORADO.
(2) (a) THE WORKING GROUP CONSISTS OF THE FOLLOWING
MEMBERS:
(I) THE PRESIDENT OF ADAMS STATE UNIVERSITY OR THEIR
DESIGNEE;
(II) THE PRESIDENT OF TRINIDAD STATE COLLEGE OR THEIR
DESIGNEE;
(III) TWO ADAMS STATE UNIVERSITY REPRESENTATIVES,
APPOINTED BY THE PRESIDENT OF ADAMS STATE UNIVERSITY OR THE
PRESIDENT'S DESIGNEE;
(IV) THE PRESIDENT OF PUEBLO COMMUNITY COLLEGE OR THEIR
DESIGNEE;
(V) THE CHANCELLOR OF THE UNIVERSITY OF COLORADO AT
DENVER OR THEIR DESIGNEE;
(VI) TWO EXPERTS FROM THE EDUCATIONAL SERVICES UNIT OF THE
COLORADO DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS, APPOINTED BY THE EXECUTIVE
-2- HB26-1093

DIRECTOR OF THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS OR THEIR DESIGNEE;
(VII) ONE FINANCIAL AID REPRESENTATIVE WITH EXPERTISE IN
SECOND CHANCE PELL GRANTS, APPOINTED BY THE PRESIDENT OF ADAMS
STATE UNIVERSITY OR THEIR DESIGNEE; AND
(VIII) ONE COLORADO COMMUNITY COLLEGE SYSTEM
REPRESENTATIVE FROM THE SYSTEM OFFICE, APPOINTED BY THE
CHANCELLOR OF THE COLORADO COMMUNITY COLLEGE SYSTEM OR THEIR
DESIGNEE.
(b) THE APPOINTING AUTHORITIES SHALL MAKE THEIR
APPOINTMENTS TO THE WORKING GROUP NO LATER THAN JULY 1, 2026.
(c) WORKING GROUP MEMBERS SERVE AT THE PLEASURE OF THEIR
RESPECTIVE APPOINTING AUTHORITIES. IF A WORKING GROUP VACANCY
OCCURS, THE APPROPRIATE APPOINTING AUTHORITY SHALL, WITHIN
FOURTEEN DAYS AFTER THE VACANCY, APPOINT A NEW MEMBER WHO
SATISFIES THE MEMBERSHIP REQUIREMENT OF THE VACATED SEAT.
(d) WORKING GROUP MEMBERS DO NOT RECEIVE COMPENSATION
OR REIMBURSEMENT FOR EXPENSES.
(3) (a) THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR OF THE DEPARTMENT OF HIGHER
EDUCATION, OR THEIR DESIGNEE, SHALL FACILITATE THE WORK OF THE
WORKING GROUP. THE WORKING GROUP SHALL ALLOW FOR REMOTE
PARTICIPATION AT EACH MEETING OF THE WORKING GROUP.
(b) THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR OF THE DEPARTMENT OF HIGHER
EDUCATION, OR THEIR DESIGNEE, SHALL CONVENE THE FIRST MEETING OF
THE WORKING GROUP NO LATER THAN JULY 31, 2026. THE WORKING
GROUP SHALL MEET AT LEAST THREE TIMES AND SHALL COMPLETE ITS
DUTIES NO LATER THAN DECEMBER 1, 2026.
(4) THE WORKING GROUP SHALL MAKE FINDINGS AND
-3- HB26-1093

RECOMMENDATIONS CONCERNING HOW TO IMPLEMENT THE COLLEGE
OPPORTUNITY FUND FOR PERSONS WHO ARE INCARCERATED IN COLORADO,
INCLUDING WHETHER FEE-FOR-SERVICE CONTRACTS FOR PARTICIPATING
INSTITUTIONS OF HIGHER EDUCATION NEED TO BE MODIFIED.
(5) THE WORKING GROUP MAY COLLABORATE WITH ANY PERSON
OR ENTITY THAT THE WORKING GROUP DEEMS APPROPRIATE TO ASSIST THE
WORKING GROUP IN PERFORMING ITS DUTIES PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION.
A STATE ENTITY THAT IS REQUESTED TO PROVIDE ASSISTANCE TO THE
WORKING GROUP SHALL ASSIST THE WORKING GROUP, TO THE EXTENT THE
ASSISTANCE PROVIDED BY THE STATE ENTITY IS CONSISTENT WITH THE
STATE ENTITY'S DUTIES AND THE LAW.
(6) ON OR BEFORE DECEMBER 1, 2026, THE WORKING GROUP
SHALL SUBMIT A REPORT THAT INCLUDES ITS FINDINGS AND
RECOMMENDATIONS TO THE EDUCATION COMMITTEES OF THE HOUSE OF
REPRESENTATIVES AND THE SENATE, OR ANY SUCCESSOR COMMITTEES.
(7) THIS SECTION IS REPEALED, EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2027.
SECTION 2. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
-4- HB26-1093